Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2724HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2228 Section 1. Section 306.47, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Upon written request by a utility 3 infrastructure owner, the department shall engage in 4 coordination activities with a utility or transmission line 5 developer to review highway corridors identified in the request 6 for potential locations to place transmission lines. The 7 department shall assign a project coordinator within thirty 8 days of receiving the written request. The department shall 9 share all known plans with affected utility or transmission 10 line developers on planned future projects in the highway 11 corridor if the planned highway project impacts the placement 12 or siting of transmission lines. 13 Sec. 2. Section 306A.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 2. a. The state department of transportation shall 16 adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 17A , embodying a utility 17 accommodation policy which imposes reasonable restrictions 18 on placements , occurring on or after the effective date 19 of the rules, on primary road rights-of-way. The rules 20 may require utilities to give notice to the department 21 prior to installation of a utility system on a primary road 22 right-of-way and obtain prior permission from the department 23 for the proposed installation. Upon written request by a 24 utility infrastructure owner, longitudinal transmission line 25 installations may be installed on a primary road right-of-way, 26 including on an interstate road right-of-way, unless the 27 department determines such an installation would endanger 28 public safety or interfere with the proper function and public 29 use of the highway. The rules shall must recognize emergency 30 situations and the need for immediate installation of service 31 extensions subject to the standards adopted by the department 32 and the utilities commission. The rules shall not be no 33 less stringent than the standards adopted by the utilities 34 commission pursuant to chapters 478 , 479 , and 479B . This 35 -1- LSB 2724HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2228 subsection shall not be construed as granting the department 1 authority which has been expressly granted to the utilities 2 commission to determine the route of utility installations. 3 If the department requires a utility company permit, the 4 department shall be required to act upon the permit application 5 within thirty days of its filing. In cases of federal-aid 6 highway projects on nonprimary highways, the local authority 7 with jurisdiction over the highway and the department shall 8 comply with all federal regulations and statutes regarding 9 utility accommodation. 10 b. If the department denies an installation of a 11 longitudinal transmission line on a primary road right-of-way, 12 including on an interstate road right-of-way, the department 13 shall make the reasons for the denial available to the public 14 within ninety days. 15